Wisconsin, session 2025, AB240.
do enact as follows:AB240,13Section 1. 77.54 (75) of the statutes is created to read:AB240,2,2477.54 (75) (a) In this subsection, “search and rescue dog” means a canine that 5is trained or being trained by a state or nationally recognized search and rescue 1agency to locate lost or missing individuals or victims of disasters in search and 2rescue activities.AB240,2,53(b) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption 4of tangible personal property used to train, manage, or control a search and rescue 5dog.AB240,26Section 2. Effective date.AB240,2,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 8publication.AB240,2,99